Oklahoma, session 2026, SB637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 732, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 732. A. A peace officer, correctional officer, or any


person acting by his or her command in his or her aid and


assistance, is justified in using deadly force when:





Req. No. 1171 Page 1


1. The officer is acting in obedience to and in accordance with


any judgment of a competent court in executing a penalty of death;


or


2. In effecting Effecting an arrest or preventing an escape


from custody following arrest and the officer reasonably believes


both that:


a. such force is necessary to prevent the arrest from


being defeated by resistance or escape, and


b. there is probable cause to believe that the person to


be arrested has committed a crime involving the


infliction or threatened infliction of serious bodily


harm, or the person to be arrested is attempting to


escape by use of a deadly weapon, or otherwise


indicates that he or she will endanger human life or


inflict great bodily harm unless arrested without


delay; or


3. The officer is in the performance of his or her legal duty


or the execution of legal process and reasonably believes the use of


the force is necessary to protect himself the officer or others from


the infliction of serious bodily harm; or


4. The force is necessary to prevent an escape from a penal


institution or other place of confinement used primarily for the


custody of persons convicted of felonies or from custody while in


transit thereto or therefrom unless the officer has reason to know:

Req. No. 1171 Page 2


a. the person escaping is not a person who has committed


a felony involving violence, and


b. the person escaping is not likely to endanger human


life or to inflict serious bodily harm if not


apprehended.


B. 1. An officer who uses deadly force shall not be subject to


criminal prosecution or civil action for the use of such deadly


force unless the deadly force is determined to be unlawful.


2. At least ten (10) days prior to the preliminary hearing in a


case where an officer has been charged and is subject to criminal


prosecution for the unlawful use of deadly force, the officer may


file a motion to dismiss the charges based on a claim that under the


provisions of this section, the officer is not subject to criminal


prosecution. If the court denies the motion to dismiss, the officer


shall have the right to file an appeal on the ruling made by the


court to the Chief Judge of the county in which the case is pending,


or the Chief Judge made the ruling, to the Presiding Judge of the


Judicial Administrative District.


3. The appeal hearing shall address whether the deadly force


used by the officer was unlawful or justified and permitted pursuant


to the provisions of this section. If, after the appeal hearing,


the court concludes that the deadly force used was justified and


permitted under the provisions of this section, the court shall


enter a written order containing findings of fact and conclusions of

Req. No. 1171 Page 3


law that the officer is not subject to criminal prosecution and that


criminal charges and proceedings shall be dismissed and shall not be


filed unless newly discovered evidence or evidence not known to the


prosecution at the time is found or discovered. If, after the


appeal hearing, the court concludes that the deadly force used was


not justified and therefore unlawful, the court shall enter an order


binding the officer over for trial.


4. As used in this subsection, the term “criminal prosecution”


includes charging or prosecuting the defendant.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 22 O.S. 2021, Section 1053, as


amended by Section 2, Chapter 209, O.S.L. 2022 (22 O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 1053), is amended to read as follows:


Section 1053. Appeals to the Court of Criminal Appeals may be


taken by the state or a municipality in the following cases only:


1. Upon judgment for the defendant on quashing or setting aside


an indictment or information;


2. Upon an order of the court arresting the judgment;


3. Upon a question reserved by the state or a municipality;


4. Upon judgment for the defendant on a motion to quash for


insufficient evidence in a felony matter;


5. Upon a pretrial order, decision, or judgment suppressing or


excluding evidence where appellate review of the issue would be in


the best interests of justice;



Req. No. 1171 Page 4


6. Upon a pretrial order, decision or judgment suppressing or


excluding evidence in cases alleging violation of any provisions of


Section 13.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


7. Upon a pretrial order, decision, or judgment finding that a


defendant is not subject to criminal prosecution under the


provisions of Section 732 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


8. Upon an order, decision or judgment finding that a defendant


is immune from or not subject to criminal prosecution.


Priority shall be given to appeals taken pursuant to paragraph


5, 6, or 7, or 8 of this section, and an order staying proceedings


shall be entered pending the outcome of the appeal.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1171 TEK 1/19/2025 5:40:29 AM





















Req. No. 1171 Page 5